langs/is/Lýsingarorðsbeyging_01.aff
SFX X N 31
SFX X	ur	0	ur
SFX X	ur	an	.
SFX X	ur	um	.
SFX X	ur	s	.
SFX X	ur	ur	.
SFX X	ur	a	.
SFX X	ur	ri	.
SFX X	ur	rar	.
SFX X	ur	t	.
SFX X	ur	u	.
SFX X	ur	ir	.
SFX X	ur	ra	.
SFX X	ur	ar	.
SFX X	ur	i	.
SFX X	ur	u	.
SFX X	ur	ari	.
SFX X	ur	ara	.
SFX X	ur	astur	.
SFX X	ur	astan	.
SFX X	ur	ustum	.
SFX X	ur	asts	.
SFX X	ur	ust	.
SFX X	ur	asta	.
SFX X	ur	astri	.
SFX X	ur	astrar	.
SFX X	ur	ast	.
SFX X	ur	ustu	.
SFX X	ur	astir	.
SFX X	ur	astra	.
SFX X	ur	astar	.
SFX X	ur	asti	.
